Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Chapter 53

Municipal Elections

6-53-101. Notice of elections.

The county election commission of each county shall hold, upon no less than one hundred twenty (120) days' notice, an election for mayor and aldermen, and other officers in any incorporated town, village, or city, according to law, who, when elected, shall have all the powers conferred on them by their respective charters of incorporation, and until their successors are elected and qualified. If the municipal corporation includes territory in two (2) or more counties, such election and all other municipal elections of such municipal corporation shall be called and conducted by the county election commission of the county in which the town seat or city hall is located.

Any municipality that has changed the term of office of any elected official shall file a certified copy of the ordinance changing such term of office with the appropriate county election commission at least seven (7) days prior to the deadline for filing the notice of election pursuant to § 2-12-111.

In municipalities with a population of one hundred twenty-five (125) or less, according to the 1960 census or any subsequent federal census, notice of municipal elections may be made by posting in five (5) public places in the municipality a proclamation of the legislative body of the town holding the municipal election; provided, that the notice shall be on heavy paper or cardboard at least eight inches (8") long and five inches (5") wide, and shall be clearly legible.

The notice provided for such towns may be made in lieu of all other notices required by law for municipal elections; provided, that the elections relate only to officers of the municipality.

Acts 1865, ch. 13, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1907, ch. 436; Shan., § 1948; Code 1932, § 3368; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3368; Acts 1959, ch. 295, § 9; 1963, ch. 387, § 1; 1965, ch. 236, § 1; 1967, ch. 9, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 160, § 2; 1974, ch. 540, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-501; Acts 2000, ch. 756, § 16; 2001, ch. 413, §§ 10, 11.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Division of municipality into wards, § 6-54-101.

Elections in city manager cities, §§ 6-20-101 — 6-20-108.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of municipal charter amendment that extends term of elected officials, OAG 00-017, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/8/00).

6-53-102. Qualifications of voters.

All persons living within such corporation and who have been residents thereof for three (3) months previous to the election, except at first election, and who are entitled to vote for members of the general assembly, shall be entitled to vote in municipal elections; provided, that if and when inclusion of additional territory within such corporation becomes effective within three (3) months next preceding the election, the length of residence during such preceding three (3) months within the added territory shall be included and recognized in applying the municipal residence requirement, prescribed by this section, as a qualification of voters in such election.

In counties having a population of not less than twenty-six thousand five hundred (26,500) nor more than twenty-seven thousand one hundred fifty (27,150), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the board of mayor and aldermen of any municipality under this chapter may by ordinance provide that any person who is a qualified voter and who owns real property situated within the corporate limits of such municipality may vote in any municipal election or referendum even though such person does not reside within the municipality.

Subdivision (b)(1) shall not be effective until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative body of any municipality to which it may apply.

All persons residing outside the corporation limits, having owned a taxable freehold within the corporation for a period of six (6) months next preceding the date of the election, and being otherwise qualified, shall also be entitled to vote at the election, in any corporations having a population of not less than twelve thousand two hundred fifty (12,250) nor more than twelve thousand three hundred (12,300), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Subdivision (c)(1) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the municipal legislative body of any municipality to which it may apply.

All persons residing outside the corporation limits, having owned a taxable freehold within the corporation for a period of six (6) months next preceding the date of the election, and being otherwise qualified, shall also be entitled to vote at the election, in any corporation having a population of not less than four hundred forty (440) persons nor more than four hundred sixty (460) persons, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Subdivision (d)(1) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the municipal legislative body of any municipality to which it may apply.

In any city with a population of less than one thousand five hundred (1,500) located in a county with a population of not less than forty-one thousand four hundred (41,400) nor more than forty-one thousand five hundred (41,500), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, all persons residing outside the corporation limits of such city who shall have owned not less than a one-half (½) interest in a taxable freehold, or husband and wife who shall have owned a taxable freehold as tenants by the entireties within the corporation for a period of six (6) months next preceding the date of such election, and being otherwise qualified, shall also be entitled to vote at such election; provided, that for the purposes of this subdivision (e)(1), all persons residing outside the corporation limits of such city and owning a time-share estate as it is defined in § 66-32-102, within the corporation, shall not be considered the owner of a taxable freehold and shall not be entitled to vote in such election.

Subdivision (e)(1) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the municipal legislative body of any municipality to which it may apply.

Subject to approval in a referendum held in accordance with subdivision (f)(2), in any city having a population of not less than three hundred forty (340) nor more than three hundred fifty (350) located in any county having a population of not less than twenty thousand (20,000) nor more than twenty thousand three hundred (20,300), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, any person residing outside the corporate limits of the city who owned at least a one-half (½) interest in a taxable freehold within such limits for the thirty-day period immediately preceding the date of such election, or any husband and wife residing outside the corporate limits of such city who owned, as tenants by the entirety, a taxable freehold within such limits for the thirty-day period immediately preceding the date of such election, shall also be entitled to vote at such election, being otherwise qualified. As used in this subdivision (f)(1), “taxable freehold” means an estate for life or a fee simple absolute in real property having an appraised value of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) for purposes of title 67, chapter 5.

Subdivision (f)(1) shall only apply in such city if a majority of the number of qualified voters of the city voting in the first city election held following April 18, 2001, approve the question of whether or not the subsection shall apply to such city. The ballots used in such election shall have printed on them the substance of this subsection (f) and the voters shall vote for or against the subsection applying in such city. The votes cast on the question shall be canvassed and the results proclaimed by the county election commission and certified by it to the secretary of state as provided by law in the case of general elections. The qualifications of voters voting on the question shall be the same as those required for participation in general elections. All laws applicable to general elections shall apply to the determination of the approval or rejection of this subsection (f).

All persons residing outside the corporate limits of any municipality having a population of not less than one thousand three hundred three (1,303) nor more than one thousand three hundred ten (1,310), located in any county having a population of not less than fifty-one thousand nine hundred (51,900) nor more than fifty-two thousand (52,000), both according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, having owned a fee simple interest in real property pursuant to the ownership requirements of § 2-2-107(a)(3) within the corporation for a period of thirty (30) days next preceding the date of the election, and being otherwise qualified, shall also be entitled to vote in municipal elections of such municipality.

Subdivision (g)(1) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the municipal legislative body of any municipality to which it may apply.

All persons residing outside the corporation limits of any municipality having a population of not less than six thousand five hundred (6,500) nor more than six thousand five hundred fifty (6,550), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, having owned a fee simple interest in real property pursuant to the ownership requirements of § 2-2-107(a)(3) within the corporation for a period of thirty (30) days next preceding the date of the election, and being otherwise qualified, shall also be entitled to vote in municipal elections of such municipality.

Subdivision (h)(1) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the municipal legislative body of any municipality to which it may apply.

All persons residing outside the corporation limits of any municipality having a population of not less than one thousand two hundred twenty-five (1,225) nor more than one thousand two hundred thirty-five (1,235), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, having owned a fee simple interest in real property pursuant to the ownership requirements of § 2-2-107(a)(3) within the corporation for a period of thirty (30) days next preceding the date of the election, and being otherwise qualified, shall also be entitled to vote in municipal elections of such municipality.

Subdivision (i)(1) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the municipal legislative body of any municipality to which it may apply.

All persons residing outside the corporation limits of any municipality having a population of not less than two thousand fifty (2,050) nor more than two thousand sixty (2,060), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, having owned a fee simple interest in real property pursuant to the ownership requirements of § 2-2-107(a)(3) within the corporation for a period of thirty (30) days next preceding the date of the election, and being otherwise qualified, shall also be entitled to vote in municipal elections of such municipality.

Subdivision (j)(1) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the municipal legislative body of any municipality to which it may apply.

Persons owning at least a fifty percent (50%) fee simple interest in a parcel of real property of at least five thousand square feet (5,000 sq. ft.) or appraised for tax purposes at not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) for the six (6) month period immediately preceding an election, who are otherwise qualified to vote in state elections in this state, shall be eligible to vote in municipal elections; provided, that the person is properly registered to vote.

Subdivision (k)(1) shall only apply in any municipality with a population of not less than five hundred thirty (530) nor more than five hundred thirty-nine (539) that is located in any county having a population of not less than fourteen thousand one hundred (14,100) nor more than fourteen thousand two hundred (14,200), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Subdivision (k)(1) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the municipal legislative body of any municipality to which it may apply.

Code 1858, §§ 1352, 1369 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 17, § 4); Acts 1875, ch. 92, § 10; integrated in Shan., § 1952; mod. Code 1932, § 3371; Acts 1947, ch. 116, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3371; Acts 1967, ch. 9, § 2; 1975, ch. 187, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-502; Acts 1980, ch. 610, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 395, § 1; 1982, ch. 924, § 1; 1984, ch. 672, § 1; 1996, ch. 679, § 1; 2001, ch. 111, § 1; 2003, ch. 52, § 1; 2004, ch. 435, § 1; 2011, ch. 80, § 1; 2012, ch. 668, § 1; 2014, ch. 920, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of populations of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. For table of Population, Incorporation Date, and Basic Charter of Tennessee Municipalities, see Volume 13.

6-53-103. Certificate of election.

Immediately after the election, the county election commission or officers holding the election shall deliver to the persons having the highest number of votes a certificate of their election.

Code 1858, § 1368 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 17, § 4); impl. am. Acts 1907, ch. 436; Shan., § 1951; mod. Code 1932, § 3370; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; T.C.A., § 6-505.

6-53-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 6-53-104 (Acts 1969, ch. 134, § 1), concerning breaking a tie vote, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 73, § 2, effective March 26, 1991. See § 2-8-111.

6-53-105. Home rule municipalities — Elections on questions requiring local approval and on amendments to charter.

In any municipality that has adopted home rule, where any question subject to local approval, under the provisions of the Constitution of Tennessee, article XI, § 9 has not been approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the local governing body, a petition signed by the qualified voters of the municipality in a number amounting to at least ten percent (10%) of the votes cast in the last election for mayor may be filed with the appropriate election commission officials not later than sixty (60) days prior to the day of the next regular election or primary, and the question shall be placed on the ballot of the next regular election. Where the total cost of conducting a special election pursuant to the Constitution of Tennessee, article XI, § 9 is defrayed completely by private financial contributions, a special election may be held for the purpose of approving or disapproving the question.

Except in counties having a metropolitan form of government and having a population of not less than four hundred twenty thousand (420,000) nor more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1970 federal census, the local governing body of any municipality that has adopted home rule may, by ordinance, propose an amendment to the charter of such municipality by a majority vote of the body and submit the same for ratification by approval of the qualified voters of the municipality, in a special election to be held for such purpose, the amendment to be limited in its substance and applicability to the establishment of a property tax rate, or the increasing or reduction thereof. When such local governing body has proposed any such amendment, it shall notify the election commission, which shall call and hold an election for the municipality after giving forty-five (45) days' notice that such election will be held. The ballot shall set forth the proposed amendment as set out in the resolution adopted by the local governing body, and the voters shall vote “For the amendment” or “Against the amendment.” Following the election the vote shall be canvassed by the county election commission and if a majority of those voting vote for the amendment, it shall become a part of the charter of such home rule municipality.

On any ballot on which an amendment to the charter of a home rule municipality appears for approval or disapproval by the electorate, a statement certified by the chief financial officer of the municipality shall appear immediately after the language describing the amendment but before the questions “For the amendment” and “Against the amendment.” The statement shall indicate the chief financial officer's estimate of the net cost savings, net cost increase, or net increase or decrease in revenues, on a yearly basis, if any, that will be effected if the amendment is approved. The statement by the financial officer shall be made readily distinguishable from the language describing the amendment itself.

Acts 1972, ch. 512, § 1; 1973, ch. 225, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 6-509; Acts 1993, ch. 199, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Repeal of adoption of home rule, OAG 98-0106, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 106 (6/11/98).

A charter commission may in its discretion frame many changes to a home rule charter as part of a single measure subject to a single vote, or may frame each change as part of a separate measure subject to a separate vote, as it deems appropriate. OAG 06-124, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 133 (8/2/06).

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

6-53-106. Filling certain vacancies.

Notwithstanding any other law or municipal charter, whenever a vacancy occurs in the membership of any city board of education whose members are elected by vote of the people or in the office of city judge who is elected by vote of the people in any city having a population in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000) within counties, except those counties with the metropolitan form of government, having a population in excess of two hundred thousand (200,000), each according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, any appointment made pursuant to law or charter provision shall be an interim appointment, valid only until the next primary or general election or referendum that is held in such city after the vacancy occurs.

At such primary or general election or referendum, the vacancy shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term by the election of some qualified candidate.

In any city to which this section applies, for those offices for which by charter or other law a special election is provided for the filling of vacancies, such charter or other law shall be controlling, but if no special election is so provided for the filling of vacancies, this section shall control.

Acts 1972, ch. 700, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-510.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Municipal Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. Election to fill a vacancy in the position of a city judge should be held at next primary election is held in the city after the vacancy occurred, OAG 03-109, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 126(9/8/03).

6-53-107. Vacancies in council.

Notwithstanding any other law or charter, whenever a vacancy occurs in the membership of the city council of any city having a population in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000) within counties, except those counties with the metropolitan form of government, having a population in excess of two hundred thousand (200,000), each according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, any appointment made to fill such vacancy under the law or charter shall be an interim appointment, valid only until the next primary or general election or referendum that is held in such city after the vacancy occurs.

At such primary or general election or referendum, the vacancy shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term by the election of some qualified candidate.

In any city to which this section applies, for those offices for which by charter or other law a special election is provided for the filling of vacancies, such charter or other law shall be controlling, but if no special election is so provided for the filling of vacancies, this section shall control.

Acts 1972, ch. 694, § 1; 1974, ch. 755, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-511.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Term of interim appointment to city council, OAG 98-0172, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 172 (8/27/98).

6-53-108. Petitions for recall elections.

The charter of any municipality to the contrary notwithstanding, any petition or petitions required to be filed under a municipal charter in order to cause a recall election of whatever type or kind, whether in the nature of a new municipal election prior to the next regular election or otherwise, shall contain one (1) or more specific grounds for removal.

This section shall be construed to be remedial and shall be given a liberal and retroactive effect where legally permissible.

Acts 1981, ch. 323, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Special elections, title 2, ch. 14.

Collateral References.

Application of constitutional “compactness requirement” to redistricting. 114 A.L.R.5th 311.

State court jurisdiction over congressional redistricting disputes. 114 A.L.R.5th 387.

Sufficiency of particular charges as affecting enforceability of recall petition. 114 A.L.R.5th 1.

Sufficiency of technical and procedural aspects of recall petitions. 116 A.L.R.5th 1.

6-53-109. Minimum age of city and municipal legislators.

Notwithstanding general law, private act, or municipal charter to the contrary, no minimum age qualification for membership on the legislative body of any municipality or city shall be greater than twenty-one (21) years of age at the time of taking office nor less than eighteen (18) years of age as a candidate for election to such office; provided, that a minimum age qualification for such membership, within such age range, may be established by a municipality or city by private act, charter provision, or ordinance if authorized by its charter.

This section shall not apply to any county with a metropolitan form of government.

Acts 1981, ch. 477, § 1.

Cross-References. Minimum age requirement for state representative, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 9.

Minimum age requirement for state senator, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 10.

Qualifications for county legislators, § 5-5-102.

6-53-110. Election districts.

Notwithstanding any other law or charter to the contrary, no member of the legislative body of a municipality, a popularly elected school board, or any other similarly constituted and elected board or commission of a county or municipality shall be elected to such office through an election procedure requiring candidates to be nominated from a district and elected at-large, but such members shall be elected from districts as established by the appropriate county or municipality, which districts shall:

Assure representation of substantially equal populations and guarantee the principle of one man/one vote in compliance with the Constitution of the United States; and

Be reasonably compact and contiguous and not overlap.

Following the establishment of the districts, such districts shall be reapportioned at least as often as districts for the county legislative body of such county are reapportioned to ensure compliance with the limitations prescribed in this section.

This section shall apply to all such elections held on and after September 1, 1983.

This section shall not apply in any municipality with a population of less than fifty thousand (50,000) persons or in any county with a population of less than ninety thousand (90,000) persons, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

This section shall not apply in any county having a population of not less than eighty-five thousand seven hundred twenty-five (85,725) nor more than eighty-five thousand eight hundred twenty-five (85,825), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

This section shall only apply to local governmental entities that use the election procedure outlined in subsection (a).

This section shall have no effect, unless it is approved by a majority of the number of qualified voters of the county or municipality to which it may apply, as the case may be, voting in an election on the question of whether or not this section should be approved. The ballots used in the first regular election held in such county or municipality after May 24, 1983, shall have printed on them the substance of this section and the voters shall vote for or against its approval. The election commission shall place this question on the ballot at the direction of the state election coordinator. The votes cast on the question shall be canvassed and the results proclaimed by the county election commission and certified by it to the secretary of state as provided by law in the case of general elections. The qualifications of voters voting on the question shall be the same as those required for participation in general elections. All laws applicable to general elections shall apply to the determination of the approval or rejection of this section.

Acts 1983, ch. 404, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

6-53-111. Home rule municipalities — Status of school board following merger with county school system.

When a home rule city having a city board of education changes its charter to repeal prospectively its charter provisions authorizing it to maintain a separate school system from the county in which it is located, no further election for the city's board of education shall be held within the period of three (3) years before the date of the merger of the city school system into the county school system. The members in office at the time of the charter vote shall remain in office until the repeal takes effect, unless the intervening period is more than three (3) years.

The powers conferred by this section are in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, charter, or home rule provision.

Acts 1995, ch. 55, § 1.